Massachusetts, session 194th, S950.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 15A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 5A the following section:-
Section 5B. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Early action”, an admissions plan that allows a student to apply at an earlier stage of the
admissions process and receive an expedited admissions decision but does not require the student
to pledge to attend the institution upon receiving a decision of admittance.
“Early decision”, an admissions plan that allows a student to apply at an earlier stage of
the admissions process, receive an expedited admissions decision, and absent extenuating
circumstances, requires the student to pledge to attend the institution upon receiving a decision
of admittance.
of 7

“Endowment”, a fund or collection of funds that supports the operation of a higher
education institution, and that is not wholly expendable by the institution on a current basis under
the terms of the applicable gift instrument or as per the intent of the donor, trustee or board of
directors of the higher education institution or related foundation.
“Higher education institution”, a public or private certificate- or degree-granting college,
junior college or university, as authorized by the board of higher education pursuant to section 9.
“Legacy”, a candidate for admission to a higher education institution with a relative who
attended or attends that higher education institution.
(b) Annually, not later than December 31, all 4-year, degree-granting higher education
institutions shall transmit to the office of the attorney general and the department of higher
education the following information annually:
(i) an averment as to whether the institution executed in the prior year an admissions
preference or special policy for: (1) legacy applicants; (2) students related to any past, current or
prospective donor; (3) students who apply early decision; and (4) students who apply early
action;
(ii) the percentage of first year, full-time students enrolled at the higher education
institution in the previous academic year who are members of the following separately
disaggregated subgroups:
(1) students that receive a maximum federal Pell Grant;
(2) students that receive a less than maximum federal Pell Grant;
(3) students that receive a federal subsidized Stafford Loan but not a federal Pell Grant;
of 7

(4) students who are a legacy, with separate disaggregated reporting within by major
racial subgroup, receipt of a maximum federal Pell Grant and receipt of a less than maximum
federal Pell Grant;
(5) students admitted as per an early decision policy, with separate disaggregated
reporting within by major racial subgroup, receipt of a maximum federal Pell Grant and receipt
of a less than maximum federal Pell Grant;
(6) students admitted as per an early action policy, with separate disaggregated reporting
within by major racial subgroup, receipt of a maximum federal Pell Grant and receipt of a less
than maximum federal Pell Grant; and
(7) students admitted to the institution through regular decision, with separate
disaggregated reporting within by major racial subgroup, receipt of a maximum federal Pell
Grant and receipt of a less than maximum federal Pell Grant;
(iii) the number of student applicants identified as having legacy status and their
admission rate, as well as the percentage of admitted legacy students among all admitted
students, and their enrollment rate;
(iv) the number of student applicants who apply early decision and early action, and
admission rate of each; and
(v) public service fee amounts contributed by each higher education institution per annum
to the Higher Education Opportunity Trust Fund, established in section 35TTT of chapter 10.
of 7

(c) The office of the attorney general and the department of higher education shall make
the information received pursuant to subsection (b) publicly available, disaggregated by higher
education institution.
(d) No higher education institution shall as a matter of written or unwritten policy, absent
paying a public service fee in an amount consistent with the provisions of subsection (e):
(i) consider legacy status as a factor in admitting a student applicant;
(ii) consider a student applicant’s relationship to a past, current or prospective donor to
the higher education institution as a factor in admitting a student applicant; or
(iii) carry out an early decision plan.
(e) (1) A higher education institution that violates a provision of this section shall pay a
public service fee to the Trust established in section 2 of a sum calculated according to the
following schedule:
(i) 0.01 per cent of its endowment for any offending higher education institution with an
endowment per student of less than $50,000, as reported in the higher education institution’s
most recent annual report;
(ii) 0.05 per cent of its endowment for any offending higher education institution with an
endowment per student of greater than $50,000 but less than $500,000, as reported in the higher
education institution’s most recent annual report;
(iii) 0.1 per cent of its endowment for any offending higher education institution with an
endowment per student of greater than $500,000 but less than $1,000,000, as reported in the
higher education institution’s most recent annual report;
of 7

(iv) 0.15 per cent of its endowment for any offending higher education institution with an
endowment per student of greater than $1,000,000 but less than $2,000,000, as reported in the
higher education institution’s most recent annual report;
(v) 0.2 per cent of endowment for any offending higher education institution with an
endowment per student of greater than $2,000,000, as reported in the higher education
institution’s most recent annual report.
(2) No offending higher education institution with endowment assets in excess of $1.5
billion shall pay a public service fee of less than $1 million. No college with endowment assets
in excess of $2 billion shall pay a public service fee of less than $2 million.
(3) Where a higher education institution is part of a university, the calculations required
by paragraph (1) shall be based on the endowment of the university and associated endowment
funds.
(f) (1) The attorney general shall establish procedures and promulgate regulations to carry
out the provisions of this section. The attorney general may investigate compliance by individual
higher education institutions and assess public service fee amounts for non-compliance in
accordance with subsection (e).
(2) The attorney general shall provide written notice to any higher education institution
that fails to timely comply with the established reporting requirements of subsection (b). The
attorney general shall notify higher education institutions that failure to respond within 2 weeks
of the written notice without just cause may result in the assessment of the public service fee in
subsection (e).
of 7

(3) No higher education institution shall pay a public service fee in excess of the
applicable amount in the schedule in subsection (e) in any 1 calendar year.
(4) All monies collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Higher
Educational Opportunity Trust Fund, established in section 35TTT of chapter 10.
SECTION 2. Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 35SSS the following section:-
100 Section 35TTT. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
101 commonwealth a Higher Education Opportunity Trust Fund, for the purposes of supporting
102 certificate and degree attainment at the commonwealth’s public community college segment and
103 state university segment of the system of public institutions of higher education, as defined in
104 section 5 of chapter 15A. The fund shall be administered by the executive office of education, as
105 directed by the fund board of trustees established in subsection (b) and in consultation with the
106 department of higher education. No expenditure from the fund shall cause the fund to be in
107 deficiency at the close of a fiscal year. Monies not expended at the end of each fiscal year shall
108 remain in the fund and shall not revert to the General Fund. The fund shall not be subject to
109 appropriation.
110 (b) The fund shall be managed by a board of trustees, which shall have general
111 supervision of the trust and shall direct all expenditures from the fund to the community college
112 and state university segments within the commonwealth system of public institutions of higher
113 education, as defined in section 5 of chapter 15A, in its discretion. The full duties and obligations
114 of the board shall be set forth in a declaration of trust to be adopted by the board. The board of
115 trustees shall consist of 7 voting trustees, including: (i) the commissioner of the department of
of 7

116 higher education or a designee; (ii) the commissioner of the department of elementary and
117 secondary education or a designee, and (iii) 5 additional voting trustees to be appointed by the
118 governor, including: 1 person with demonstrated expertise in elementary and secondary
119 education, 1 person with demonstrated expertise in higher education, 1 person with demonstrated
120 expertise in representing the education workforce as a leader in a labor organization, 1 person
121 who is an employee of a Massachusetts community college, as defined in section 10 of chapter
122 15A, and 1 person who is an employee of a private higher education institution subject to
123 subsection (e) of section 5B of chapter 15A. The appointed voting trustees shall serve for terms
124 of 2 years. Trustees shall be eligible for reappointment. The voting trustees shall elect 1 of the
125 trustees to serve as the chair. There shall be 6 non-voting trustees, 2 of whom shall be appointed
126 by the senate president, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader of the senate, 2 of
127 whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and 1 of whom shall be
128 appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives.
129 SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
of 7